Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. State Physical Therapy and Occupational Therapy Board.

Administrative Code. —

For state physical therapy and occupational therapy board, see 12 AAC 54.

For physical therapy licensure by examination, see 12 AAC 54, art. 1.

Sec. 08.84.010.
Creation and membership of board.

There is created the State Physical Therapy and Occupational Therapy Board, which consists of seven members. The membership consists of one physician licensed to practice medicine in the state, three physical therapists licensed in the state or two physical therapists and a physical therapy assistant licensed in the state, two occupational therapists licensed in the state or an occupational therapist and occupational therapy assistant licensed in the state, and one lay person with no direct financial interest in the health care industry. Members of the board shall be United States citizens domiciled in the state.

The board shall control all matters pertaining to the licensing of physical therapists, physical therapy assistants, occupational therapists, and occupational therapy assistants and the practice of physical therapy and the practice of occupational therapy. The board shall

pass upon the qualifications of applicants;

provide for the examination of applicants;

issue temporary permits and licenses to persons qualified under this chapter;

suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a license under AS

08.84.120

;

keep a current register listing the name, business address, date, and number of the license of each person who is licensed to practice under this chapter;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter including regulations establishing qualifications for licensure and renewal of licensure under this chapter.

History.

(§ 15 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 8 ch 49 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am §§ 40, 41 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraph (b)(7) was renumbered as (b)(6) in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (b)(6).

Cross references. —

For appointment and terms, see AS

08.01.035

.

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy licensure by examination, see 12 AAC 54, art. 1.

For physical therapy licensure by credentials, see 12 AAC 54, art. 2.

For physical therapy license renewal and continuing competency requirements, see 12 AAC 54, art. 3.

For physical therapy standards of practice, see 12 AAC 54, art. 4.

For occupational therapy licensure, see 12 AAC 54, art. 5.

For occupational therapy license renewal and continuing competency requirements, see 12 AAC 54, art. 6.

For occupational therapy standards of practice, see 12 AAC 54, art. 7.

Sec. 08.84.020.
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act.

The board shall comply with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)